Hawaii statutes.
§425E-906 Cancellation of certificate
of authority. (a) The director may cancel the certificate of
authority of a limited partnership administratively if:

(1) The partnership fails to:

(A) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(B) File its annual statement for a period of
two years;

(C) Appoint and maintain an agent for service
of process as required by chapter 425R; or

(D) File a statement of a change in the name
or business address of the agent as required by section 425R-7; or

(2) A misrepresentation has been made of any material
matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record or document
submitted by the partnership.

(b) Cancellation of a certificate of authority
shall not relieve the general partners of liability for the penalties for
failure to file any statement or certificate required by this chapter. [L 2003,
c 210, pt of §1; am L 2009, c 55, §50]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next